Illinois, session 104th, SB537.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The General Obligation Bond Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 330/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 651)7    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "General Obligation Bond Act".9(Source: P.A. 92-13, eff. 6-22-01.)